New York, session 2025-2026, A3667.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 201-g of the labor law, as added 2 by section 1 of subpart E of part KK of chapter 57 of the laws of 2018, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 3. a. The department shall consult with the division of human rights 5 to create a system for every employer to affirmatively acknowledge that 6 the employer has met or exceeded the sexual harassment prevention policy 7 minimum standards required by this section and the regulations promul- 8 gated by the commissioner in accordance with this section. 9 b. Each employer shall submit to the department an affirmative 10 acknowledgement that the employer has met or exceeded the sexual harass- 11 ment prevention policy minimum standards required by this section and 12 the regulations promulgated by the commissioner in accordance with this 13 section upon the completion of the employer's annual sexual harassment 14 prevention training and upon the completion of the sexual harassment 15 prevention training if any person newly hired by the employer. The 16 employer shall use the system created by the department under paragraph 17 a of this subdivision to submit the affirmative acknowledgements 18 required by this paragraph. 19 3-a. The commissioner [may] shall promulgate regulations [as he or she 20 deems necessary] for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this 21 section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06319-01-5